Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-705
Department of Economic Development; Affordable Housing Trust Fund; duties.

The Department of Economic Development shall use the Affordable Housing Trust Fund to finance loans, grants, subsidies, credit enhancements, and other financial assistance for community affordable housing projects and for expenses of the department as appropriated by the Legislature for administering the fund.

Laws 1996, LB 1322, § 15.